Ohio, session 136, HB272.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 3704.99 and 6109.20 be amended 12
and sections 3704.21, 3715.591, 3745.61, 3745.62, 3745.63, 13
3745.64, 3745.65, 3745.66, and 3745.67 of the Revised Code be 14
enacted to read as follows: 15
Sec. 3704.21. No person shall purposely inject, release, 16
or disperse, by any means, chemicals, chemical compounds, 17
substances, or apparatus within the borders of this state into 18
the atmosphere with the express purpose of affecting 19

H. B. No. 272 Page 2
As Introduced
temperature, weather, or the intensity of the sunlight. 20
Sec. 3704.99. (A) Whoever recklessly violates division 21
(A), (B), (C), (D), (E), (F), (G), or (I) of section 3704.05 or 22
division (B)(5) of section 3704.16 of the Revised Code shall be 23
fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars or imprisoned 24
not more than one year, or both, for each violation. Each day 25
the violation continues after a conviction for a violation is a 26
separate offense. 27
(B) Whoever knowingly violates division (H), (J), or (K) 28
of section 3704.05 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more 29
than ten thousand dollars for each day of each such violation. 30
(C) Whoever violates section 3704.15 of the Revised Code 31
is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. 32
(D) Whoever violates division (B)(2) or knowingly violates 33
division (C)(1) of section 3704.16 of the Revised Code is guilty 34
of a minor misdemeanor. 35
(E) Whoever violates division (B)(1) or (3) or knowingly 36
violates division (C)(2) or (3) of section 3704.16 of the 37
Revised Code shall be fined not less than five hundred nor more 38
than twenty-five hundred dollars for each day of each violation. 39
(F) Whoever recklessly violates division (B)(4) of section 40
3704.16 of the Revised Code shall be fined not more than twenty- 41
five thousand dollars or imprisoned not more than one year, or 42
both, for each violation. Each day the violation continues after 43
a conviction for a violation is a separate offense. 44
(G) The sentencing court, in addition to the penalty 45
provided in divisions (D), (E), and (F) of this section, shall 46
order the offender to restore within thirty days any emission 47
control system that was tampered with in connection with the 48

H. B. No. 272 Page 3
As Introduced
violation or to provide proof that the motor vehicle whose 49
emission control system was tampered with has been dismantled or 50
destroyed. The court may extend that deadline for good cause 51
shown. If the offender does not take the corrective action 52
ordered under this division, each day that the violation 53
continues is a separate offense. Violation of a court order 54
entered under this division is punishable as contempt under 55
Chapter 2705. of the Revised Code. 56
(H) Whoever violates section 3704.21 of the Revised Code 57
is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree and, 58
notwithstanding section 2929.28 of the Revised Code, shall be 59
fined ten thousand dollars for each violation. Each day of 60
violation constitutes a separate offense. 61
Sec. 3715.591. Food is adulterated within the meaning of 62
this chapter if any of the following apply: 63
(A) It bears or contains any of the following: 64
(1) Titanium dioxide; 65
(2) Brominated vegetable oil; 66
(3) Potassium bromate; 67
(4) Propylparaben; 68
(5) Azodicarbonamide; 69
(6) Butylated hydroxytoluene (BHT); 70
(7) Butylated hydroxyanisole. 71
(B) It bears or contains any of the following food dyes: 72
(1) Red dye 3 or erythrosine; 73
(2) Red dye 40; 74

H. B. No. 272 Page 4
As Introduced
(3) Yellow dye 5 or tartrazine; 75
(4) Yellow dye 6 or sunset yellow; 76
(5) Blue dye 1; 77
(6) Blue dye 2 or indigotine or indigo carmine; 78
(7) Green dye 3. 79
Sec. 3745.61. As used in sections 3745.61 to 3745.67 of 80
the Revised Code: 81
(A) "Carpet or rug" means a fabric marketed or intended 82
for use as a floor covering. 83
(B) "Chemical" means a substance with a distinct molecular 84
composition or a group of structurally related substances and 85
includes the substances that form through breakdown, 86
decomposition, degradation, or metabolism of the substance. 87
(C) "Cleaning product" means a finished product used for 88
general cleaning purposes, including any of the following: 89
(1) A polish or floor maintenance product; 90
(2) An air care product labeled for the intended use of 91
enhancing or conditioning the indoor environment by eliminating 92
unpleasant odors or freshening the air; 93
(3) An automotive maintenance product labeled for the 94
intended use of maintaining the appearance of a motor vehicle. 95
"Cleaning product" does not include automotive paint or 96
paint repair products. 97
(D) "Consumer product" means tangible personal property 98
that is distributed in commerce and normally used for personal, 99
family, or household use, including product categories that are 100

H. B. No. 272 Page 5
As Introduced
normally used in households but designed for or sold to 101
businesses, such as commercial carpet or floor waxes. 102
(E) "Cookware" means durable houseware items intended for 103
direct food contact and used to prepare, dispense, or store 104
food, foodstuffs, or beverages; 105
(F) "Cosmetic" means a product or product component, other 106
than soap, intended to be applied to the human body for 107
cleansing, beautifying, or promoting attractiveness. 108
(G) "Currently unavoidable use" means a use of PFAS that 109
the director of environmental protection has determined by rule 110
to be essential for health, safety, or the functioning of 111
society, and for which alternatives are not reasonably 112
available. 113
(H) "Fabric treatment" means a substance applied to fabric 114
for stain, grease, or water resistance, or flame retardance. 115
(I) "Feminine hygiene product" means a disposable or 116
reusable product to collect menstruation and vaginal discharge, 117
including tampons, pads, sponges, menstruation underwear, discs, 118
applicators, and menstruation cups. 119
(J) "Firefighting foam" means an aqueous film-forming foam 120
containing an intentionally added PFAS. 121
(K) "Food packaging" means a container, unit package, 122
intermediate package, or shipping container applied to or 123
providing a means to market, protect, handle, deliver, serve, 124
contain, or store a food or beverage, including an individually 125
assembled part of a food package. 126
(L) "Intentionally added" means a PFAS deliberately added 127
or used during the manufacture of a product in which the 128

H. B. No. 272 Page 6
As Introduced
continued presence, at any level or concentration, of the PFAS 129
is desired or expected in the final product or one of the 130
product's components. 131
(M) "Juvenile product" means a product designed or 132
marketed for use by children under twelve years of age, 133
including children's car seats, clothes, and toys, but does not 134
include an electronic product, including: 135
(1) Personal computers and any associated equipment; 136
(2) Audio and video equipment; 137
(3) Calculators; 138
(4) Wireless phones; 139
(5) Gaming consoles; 140
(6) Handheld devices incorporating a video screen and any 141
associated peripheral device such as a mouse, keyboard, power 142
supply unit, or power cord. 143
(N) "Manufacturer" means: 144
(1) A person, firm, association, partnership, corporation, 145
organization, combination, or a joint venture that creates, 146
produces, or assembles a product or whose brand name is affixed 147
to a product; 148
(2) In the case of a product imported into the United 149
States, an importer or first domestic distributor of the 150
product, provided that the entity or person that created, 151
produced, or assembled the product or whose brand name is 152
affixed to the product does not have an office or employees in 153
the United States. 154
(O) "Medical device" means an instrument, apparatus, 155

H. B. No. 272 Page 7
As Introduced
implement, machine, implant, in vitro reagent, or other similar 156
or related device, including any component or accessory, that is 157
a product regulated as a drug or medical device by the United 158
State food and drug administration under the "Federal Food, 159
Drug, and Cosmetic Act," 21 U.S.C. 301, et seq., and that 160
satisfies any of the following: 161
(1) It is recognized in an official compendium. 162
(2) It is intended for use in the diagnosis of disease or 163
other conditions or in the cure, mitigation, treatment, or 164
prevention of disease in a human or animal. 165
(3) It is intended to affect the structure or function of 166
the body of a human or an animal, does not achieve its principal 167
intended purposes through chemical action within or on the body 168
of a human or animal, and does not depend on being metabolized 169
for achievement of its principal intended purpose. 170
(P) "Official compendium" means a comprehensive, 171
authoritative listing of recognized medical devices, including 172
listings published by a federal regulatory body, that detail 173
specifications standards and accepted uses of medical devices. 174
(Q) "PFAS" has the same meaning as "per- and 175
polyfluoroalkyl substances or PFAS" in 40 C.F.R. 705.3. 176
(R) "Product" means an item created, produced, assembled, 177
packaged, or otherwise prepared for sale to consumers, including 178
a product component sold or distributed for personal, 179
residential, commercial, or industrial use, including for use in 180
making another product. 181
(S) "Sell" and "sale" includes offering for sale, 182
distributing, or distributing for sale directly or indirectly or 183
through intermediaries. 184

H. B. No. 272 Page 8
As Introduced
(T) "Ski wax" means a lubricant applied to the bottom of a 185
snow runner, including a ski or snowboard, to improve grip or 186
glide properties, and includes associated tuning products. 187
(U) "Textile" means an item made in whole or in part from 188
a natural or synthetic fiber, yarn, or fabric, including 189
leather, cotton, silk, jute, hemp, wool, viscose, nylon, or 190
polyester. 191
(V) "Textile furnishings" means a textile product made in 192
whole or part from a natural or synthetic fiber, yarn, or fabric 193
that is used as furniture or a decorative accessory. 194
(W) "Upholstered furniture" means furniture that is wholly 195
or partially stuffed with a filling material. 196
Sec. 3745.62. Sections 3745.63 and 3745.64 of the Revised 197
Code do not apply to any of the following: 198
(A) A product for which federal law governs the presence 199
of PFAS in the product in a manner that preempts state 200
authority. 201
(B) Used products offered for sale or resale. 202
(C) Medical devices or drugs, and the packaging of the 203
medical devices or drugs, that are regulated by the United 204
States food and drug administration, including prosthetic and 205
orthotic devices. 206
(D) Cooling, heating, ventilation, air conditioning, or 207
refrigeration equipment that contains intentionally added PFAS 208
or refrigerants listed as acceptable, subject to use conditions, 209
or subject to narrow use limits by the United States 210
environmental protection agency pursuant to the significant new 211
alternatives policy program, 40 C.F.R. 82, subpart G, provided 212

H. B. No. 272 Page 9
As Introduced
the equipment is for sale for the authorized use specified under 213
that program. 214
(E) A veterinary product and its packaging intended for 215
use in or on animals, including diagnostic equipment or test 216
kits, and the veterinary product's components and any product 217
that is a veterinary medical device, drug, biologic, or 218
parasiticide, or any product that is otherwise used in a 219
veterinary medical setting or in veterinary medical applications 220
that are regulated by or under the jurisdiction of any of the 221
following: 222
(1) The United States food and drug administration; 223
(2) The United States department of agriculture pursuant 224
to the federal "Virus-Serum-Toxin Act," 21 U.S.C. 151, et seq.; 225
(3) The United States environmental protection agency 226
pursuant to the "Federal Insecticide, Fungicide, and Rodenticide 227
Act," 7 U.S.C. 136, et seq., except that any such products 228
approved by the United States environmental protection agency 229
pursuant to that law for aerial and land application are not 230
exempt. 231
(F) A product developed or manufactured for the purpose of 232
public health or environmental or water quality testing. 233
(G) A motor vehicle or motor vehicle equipment regulated 234
under a federal motor vehicle safety standard, as defined in 49 235
U.S.C. 30102, except that the exemption does not apply to any 236
textile article or refrigerant that is included in or as a 237
component part of such products. 238
(H) Any other motor vehicle, including an off-highway 239
vehicle or specialty motor vehicle, such as an all-terrain 240
vehicle, a side-by-side vehicle, farm equipment, or a personal 241

H. B. No. 272 Page 10
As Introduced
assistive mobility device. 242
(I) A watercraft, aircraft, lighter-than-air aircraft, or 243
seaplane. 244
(J) A semiconductor, including semiconductors incorporated 245
in electric equipment, and materials used in the manufacture of 246
semiconductors. 247
(K) Non-consumer electronic and non-consumer laboratory 248
equipment not ordinarily used for personal, family, or household 249
purposes. 250
(L) A product that contains intentionally added PFAS with 251
uses that are currently listed as acceptable, acceptable subject 252
to use conditions, or acceptable subject to narrowed use limits 253
in the United States environmental protection agency's 254
regulations under the significant new alternatives policy 255
program, 40 C.F.R. 82, provided that the product contains PFAS 256
that are being used as substitutes for ozone-depleting 257
substances under the conditions specified in the regulations. 258
(M) A product used for the generation, distribution, or 259
storage of electricity. 260
(N) Equipment directly used in the manufacture or 261
development of the products described in divisions (A) to (M) of 262
this section. 263
(O) A product for which the director of environmental 264
protection has adopted a rule providing that the use of the PFAS 265
in that product is a currently unavoidable use. 266
(P) A product that contains fluoropolymers consisting of 267
polymeric substances for which the backbone of the polymer is 268
either a per- or polyfluorinated carbon-only backbone or a 269

H. B. No. 272 Page 11
As Introduced
perfluorinated polyether backbone that is a solid at standard 270
temperature and pressure. 271
Sec. 3745.63. (A) Beginning January 1, 2027, no 272
manufacturer shall sell the following products if that product 273
contains an intentionally added PFAS: 274
(1) Cookware; 275
(2) Food packaging; 276
(3) Dental floss; 277
(4) Juvenile products; 278
(5) Firefighting foam. 279
(B) Beginning January 1, 2028, no manufacturer shall sell 280
the following products if that product contains an intentionally 281
added PFAS: 282
(1) Carpets or rugs; 283
(2) Cleaning products; 284
(3) Cosmetics; 285
(4) Fabric treatments; 286
(5) Feminine hygiene products; 287
(6) Textiles; 288
(7) Textile furnishings; 289
(8) Ski wax; 290
(9) Upholstered furniture. 291
(C) Beginning January 1, 2032, no manufacturer shall sell 292
a product containing an intentionally added PFAS unless the 293

H. B. No. 272 Page 12
As Introduced
director of environmental protection has adopted a rule in 294
accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code providing that 295
the use of PFAS in that product is a currently unavoidable use. 296
(D) Until January 1, 2032, the director may adopt rules in 297
accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code to prohibit a 298
manufacturer from selling a consumer product not listed in 299
division (A) or (B) of this section that contains an 300
intentionally added PFAS. The director shall adopt such rules 301
upon a finding of fact that prohibiting the sale of the consumer 302
product is necessary to protect human health or the environment. 303
In adopting rules under this division, the director shall do 304
both of the following: 305
(1) Establish an effective date for each such prohibition 306
that is not less than six months after the adoption of the final 307
rule establishing the prohibition. No such effective date shall 308
be earlier than January 1, 2027. 309
(2) Prioritize prohibitions of consumer products 310
containing intentionally added PFAS that are most likely to harm 311
humans or contaminate the environment. 312
(E) This section does not apply to a pesticide regulated 313
by or under the jurisdiction of the "Federal Insecticide, 314
Fungicide, and Rodenticide Act," 7 U.S.C. 136, et seq. 315
Sec. 3745.64. (A) The director of environmental protectio n 316
shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised 317
Code that require a manufacturer to submit the following 318
information to the director for a product that contains an 319
intentionally added PFAS: 320
(1) A brief description of the product, including a 321
universal product code, stock keeping unit, or other numeric 322

H. B. No. 272 Page 13
As Introduced
code assigned to the product; 323
(2) The purpose for which the PFAS is used in the product; 324
(3) The amount of each PFAS in the product, identified by 325
its chemical abstracts service registry number and reported as 326
an exact quantity determined using commercially available 327
analytical methods, or reported as falling within a range 328
approved for reporting purposes by the director; 329
(4) The name and address of the manufacturer, and the 330
name, address, and telephone number of a contact person for the 331
manufacturer; 332
(5) Any additional information requested by the director, 333
as necessary, provided that the director shall not require 334
disclosure of records, reports, or information, or particular 335
parts of records, reports, or information, that would divulge 336
confidential business records, methods, or processes that the 337
manufacturer demonstrates is entitled to protection as a trade 338
secret. 339
(B) Not later than January 1, 2027, a manufacturer of a 340
product for sale in this state that contains an intentionally 341
added PFAS shall submit to the director of environmental 342
protection the information required by rules adopted under this 343
section. 344
(C) Beginning January 1, 2028, no manufacturer shall sell 345
a product if testing requested by the director under section 346
3745.65 of the Revised Code demonstrates that the product 347
contains an intentionally added PFAS and that the manufacturer 348
failed to provide the director the information required by rules 349
adopted under this section. 350
(D) Beginning January 1, 2028, no manufacturer shall sell 351

H. B. No. 272 Page 14
As Introduced
a product that contains an intentionally added PFAS unless the 352
manufacturer has submitted to the director the information 353
required by rules adopted under this section. 354
(E) A manufacturer shall submit a revision of the 355
information provided about a product pursuant this section not 356
later than thirty days after a significant change to the 357
information that the manufacturer previously submitted or upon 358
the request of the director. 359
(F) Upon written approval from the director, a 360
manufacturer may provide the information required by this 361
section to the director for a category, type of product, or 362
product component. 363
(G) The director may waive the obligation of a 364
manufacturer to submit all or part of the information required 365
by rules adopted under this section if the director determines 366
that substantially equivalent information is publicly available. 367
The director may grant a waiver to a manufacturer or a group of 368
manufacturers for multiple products or a product category. 369
(H) The director may extend the deadline for a 370
manufacturer to submit the information required by this section 371
upon a determination by the director that circumstances merit an 372
extension of time. 373
(I) The director may enter into an agreement with one or 374
more states or political subdivisions of a state to collect and 375
share information otherwise required to be submitted by this 376
section. The director may accept such information as meeting the 377
information submission requirements of this section. 378
(J) Not later than sixty days after receiving the 379
information required by this section from a manufacturer, the 380

H. B. No. 272 Page 15
As Introduced
director shall notify the manufacturer that adequate information 381
has been received or that additional information is required. A 382
manufacturer shall submit to the director any additional 383
information requested by the director not later than thirty days 384
after the request. 385
Sec. 3745.65. (A) If the director of environmental 386
protection has reason to believe that a product containing 387
intentionally added PFAS is for sale in this state and the sale 388
of such product is prohibited under section 3745.63 of the 389
Revised Code, the director may direct the manufacturer of the 390
product to, within thirty days, provide testing results that 391
demonstrate the amount of each PFAS in the product, if any. The 392
manufacturer shall identify any PFAS as an exact quantity 393
determined using commercially available analytical methods or as 394
falling within a range approved for reporting purposes by the 395
director. 396
(B) If testing demonstrates that the product does not 397
contain an intentionally added PFAS, the manufacturer shall 398
provide the director with a certificate of compliance attesting 399
that the product does not contain an intentionally added PFAS. 400
The manufacturer also shall submit the testing results and any 401
other relevant information requested by the director. 402
(C) If testing demonstrates that the product contains an 403
intentionally added PFAS, the manufacturer shall do both of the 404
following: 405
(1) Provide the director, within thirty days, the 406
information required for the product pursuant to section 3745.64 407
of the Revised Code; 408
(2) Notify each person that sells the product in this 409

H. B. No. 272 Page 16
As Introduced
state that the sale of the product is prohibited and provide the 410
director with a list of the names and addresses of the persons 411
so notified. 412
(D) The director may notify a person that sells a product 413
prohibited under sections 3745.61 to 3745.66 of the Revised Code 414
that the product is prohibited in this state. 415
Sec. 3745.66. (A) The director of environmental protectio n 416
shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised 417
Code to do all of the following: 418
(1) Exempt from the reporting requirements established 419
under section 3745.64 of the Revised Code any product that 420
contains an intentionally added PFAS that is exempt under 421
section 3745.62 of the Revised Code or that has been designated 422
as having a currently unavoidable use by the director; 423
(2) Create a series of ranges for the amount of a PFAS in 424
a product that contains an intentionally added PFAS for 425
reporting purposes unless exempt under section 3745.62 of the 426
Revised Code; 427
(3) Identify currently unavoidable uses of PFAS that are 428
essential for health, safety, or the functioning of society and 429
for which alternatives are not reasonably available; 430
(4) Except as otherwise provided in section 3737.52 of the 431
Revised Code, regarding firefighting foam: 432
(a) Require a periodic inventory of firefighting foam 433
quantities stored or used in this state; 434
(b) Require the use of firefighting foam for emergency 435
purposes only; 436
(c) Require the cleanup of discarded firefighting foam 437

H. B. No. 272 Page 17
As Introduced
pursuant to Chapter 3734. of the Revised Code. 438
As used in division (A)(4) of this section, "emergency 439
purposes" does not include training or the use of firefighting 440
foam in fire suppression systems. 441
(B) The director may do the following: 442
(1) Adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the 443
Revised Code to carry out sections 3745.61 to 3745.67 of the 444
Revised Code, including the following: 445
(a) Requiring the labeling of products in English and 446
Spanish; 447
(b) Prohibiting consumer products that contain an 448
intentionally added PFAS by category or use upon a finding of 449
fact that a prohibition on the product is necessary to protect 450
human health or the environment; 451
(c) Designating that the use of a PFAS in a certain 452
product is a currently unavoidable use as provided in section 453
3745.63 of the Revised Code. 454
(2) Determine that a product containing intentionally 455
added PFAS are a currently unavoidable use based on 456
determinations made by other states. 457
(C) Prior to adopting a rule under division (B)(1)(b) or 458
(c) of this section regarding a pesticide, fertilizer, 459
agricultural liming material, or plant or soil amendment that 460
contains an intentionally added PFAS, the director shall consult 461
with the director of agriculture. 462
Sec. 3745.67. Any manufacturer that violates sections 463
3745.61 to 3745.66 of the Revised Code or a rule adopted or 464
order issued under those sections shall pay a civil penalty of 465

H. B. No. 272 Page 18
As Introduced
not more than fifteen thousand dollars for each violation, to be 466
paid into the state treasury to the credit of the general 467
revenue fund. Each day that a violation continues constitutes a 468
separate offense. The attorney general, upon written request by 469
the director of environmental protection, shall bring an action 470
for such a penalty against any manufacturer that violates 471
sections 3745.61 to 3745.66 of the Revised Code. Such an action 472
is a civil action, governed by the Rules of Civil Procedure and 473
other rules of practice and procedure applicable to civil 474
actions. 475
Any civil penalties imposed under this section do not 476
limit a manufacturer's liability in other causes of action. 477
Sec. 6109.20. If the natural fluoride content of supplied 478
water of a public water system is less than eight-tenths 479
milligrams per liter of water, a public water system may add 480
fluoride shall be added to such water to maintain fluoride 481
content of not less than eight-tenths milligrams per liter of 482
water nor more than one and three-tenths milligrams per liter of 483
water beginning: 484
(A) On or before January 1, 1971, for a public water 485
system supplying water to twenty thousand or more persons; 486
(B) On or before January 1, 1972, for a public water 487
system supplying water to five thousand or more persons, but 488
less than twenty thousand persons. 489
Section 2. That existing sections 3704.99 and 6109.20 of 490
the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 491
Section 3. This act shall be known as the Protecting 492
Utility and Resources for Enhanced Living, Improved Food, and 493
Environment Act. 494